Virginia statutes. Title 5.1. Aviation.
Article 5. Regulation of Brokers.

§ 5.1-108.
When broker’s license required.

No person shall for compensation sell or offer for sale transportation subject to this chapter or shall make any contract, agreement, or arrangement to provide, procure, furnish, or arrange for such transportation or shall hold himself or itself out by advertisement, solicitation, or otherwise as one who sells, provides, procures, contracts, or arranges for such transportation, unless such person holds a broker’s license issued by the Commission to engage in such transactions; provided that the provisions of this section shall not apply to any carrier holding a certificate or permit under the provisions of this chapter or to any bona fide employee or agent of such carrier so far as concerns transportation to be furnished wholly by such carrier or jointly with other air carriers holding like certificates or permits, or with a common carrier by railroad, motor vehicle, express or water; nor shall they apply to any air carrier not engaged in intrastate operations or to any bona fide employee of such carrier.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-162; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-109.
Application for broker’s license.

The Commission shall prescribe the form of application for a broker’s license and such reasonable requirements and information as may in its judgment be necessary, and may assess a fee of ten dollars for filing.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-163; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-110.
Hearing on such application and action thereon.

Upon the filing of an application for a broker’s license the Commission may fix a time and place for the hearing of the application and require such notices, publication, or other service as may, in its judgment, be necessary. If the Commission finds the application proper and in the public interest it shall issue a license, subject to such terms, limitations and restrictions as the Commission may deem proper.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-164; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-111.
Authority over brokers; bond.

The Commission shall have the same authority over persons operating under and holding a brokerage license as it has over air carriers under this chapter and shall require a broker to furnish bond or other security approved by the Commission and sufficient for the protection of travelers or shippers by aircraft.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-165; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-112.
Broker’s license not substitute for other certificates or permits required.

No person who holds a broker’s license under this chapter shall engage in transportation subject to this chapter unless he holds a certificate or permit as provided in this chapter. In the execution of any contract, agreement, or arrangement to sell, provide, procure, furnish, or arrange for such transportation, it shall be unlawful for such person to employ any aircraft which is not the lawful holder of an effective certificate or permit issued as provided in this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-166; 1970, c. 708.